el: Τύπος μηχανισμού ασφαλείας: Βιδωτός; Κλωβός ασφαλείας; Ελαστικός ιμάντας (Peacock); Πτυσσόμενος; Μαγνητική απασφάλιση; Κανένας; Με πείρο και σωλήνα; Περιστροφική απασφάλιση; Βραχίονες ασφαλείας; Ιμάντες ασφαλείας; Βραχίονας πλευρικού ανοίγματος; Περιστρεφόμενος βραχίονας; Άλλο
hu: Biztonsági mechanizmus típusa: Csavaros; Gyorsoldó keret; Gumiheveder (Peacock); Lehajtható; Mágneses kioldó; Nincs; Csapos és csöves; Forgó kioldó; Biztonsági tartókarok; Biztonsági hevederek; Oldalra nyíló kar; Lengőkar; Egyéb
en: Safety mechanism type: Bolt-on; Breakaway cage; Elastic band (Peacock); Flip-down; Magnetic release; None; Pin & pipe; Rotational release; Safety spotter arms; Safety straps; Side-opening arm; Swinging arm; Other
ru: Тип механизма безопасности: На болтах; Отрывная клетка; Эластичная лента (Peacock); Откидной; Магнитное расцепление; Нет; Штифт и трубка; Вращательное расцепление; Страховочные упоры; Страховочные ремни; Открывающаяся сбоку дужка; Качающаяся дужка; Другое
nb: Type sikkerhetsmekanisme: Fastboltet; Breakaway-bur; Elastisk bånd (Peacock); Nedfellbar; Magnetisk utløser; Ingen; Sikringspinne og -rør; Roterende utløser; Sikringsarmer; Sikkerhetsstropper; Sideåpnende arm; Svingarm; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta sigurnosnog mehanizma: Na vijke; Odvojivi kavez; Elastična traka (Peacock); Preklopno prema dolje; Magnetsko otpuštanje; Nema; Klin i cijev; Rotacijsko otpuštanje; Sigurnosne ruke (spotter); Sigurnosne trake; Ruka s bočnim otvaranjem; Zakretna ruka; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta varnostnega mehanizma: Pritrditev z vijaki; Snemljiva varnostna kletka; Elastični trak (Peacock); Preklopno navzdol; Magnetna sprostitev; Brez; Zatič in cev; Rotacijska sprostitev; Varnostne roke; Varnostni trakovi; Roka s stranskim odpiranjem; Nihajna roka; Drugo
lt-LT: Saugos mechanizmo tipas: Prisukamas; Atkabinamas lankelis; Elastinė juostelė („Peacock“); Nulenkiamas; Magnetinis atlaisvinimas; Nėra; Smeigtukas ir vamzdelis; Sukamas atlaisvinimas; Apsauginės atramos; Apsauginiai diržai; Šoninis atidarymo lankelis; Svyruojantis lankelis; Kita
da: Sikkerhedsmekanismetype: Påskruet; Breakaway-bur; Elastikbånd (Peacock); Nedklappelig; Magnetisk udløser; Ingen; Pin og pipe; Roterende udløser; Sikkerhedsarme (spotter); Sikkerhedsstropper; Sideåbnende arm; Svingarm; Andet
ko: 안전 메커니즘 유형: 볼트 온; 브레이크어웨이 케이지; 고무 밴드(피콕); 플립다운; 마그네틱 릴리스; 없음; 핀 및 파이프; 회전형 릴리스; 안전 스포터 암; 안전 스트랩; 측면 개방형 암; 스윙 암; 기타
cs: Typ bezpečnostního mechanismu: Šroubovací; Bezpečnostní mechanismus (Breakaway); Gumička (Peacock); Sklápěcí; Magnetické uvolnění; Žádný; Kolík a trubka; Rotační uvolnění; Bezpečnostní ramena; Bezpečnostní popruhy; Do strany otevíratelné rameno; Výkyvné rameno; Jiné
pt-BR: Segurança, tipo de mecanismo: Aparafusado; Gaiola de liberação rápida; Elástico (Peacock); Dobrável para baixo; Liberação magnética; Nenhum; Pino e tubo; Liberação rotacional; Braços de segurança; Fitas de segurança; Braço de abertura lateral; Braço oscilante; Outros
pt-PT: Tipo de mecanismo de segurança: Aparafusado; Gaiola separável; Fita elástica (Peacock); Rebatível; Libertação magnética; Nenhum; Pino e tubo; Libertação rotacional; Braços de segurança; Correias de segurança; Braço de abertura lateral; Braço oscilante; Outro
zh-TW: 安全機制類型: 螺栓固定式; 脫離式護罩; 彈性帶 (孔雀型); 下翻式; 磁力釋放; 無; 插銷與鋼管; 旋轉釋放; 安全護槓架; 安全護帶; 側開臂; 擺臂; 其他
ja: 安全メカニズムタイプ: ボルトオン; ブレイクアウェイケージ; ゴムバンド (ピーコック); フリップダウン; マグネットリリース; なし; ピン＆パイプ; 回転リリース; セーフティスポッターアーム; セーフティストラップ; サイドオープニングアーム; スイングアーム; その他
ro-RO: Tip de mecanism de siguranță: Fixare cu șuruburi; Cușcă detașabilă de siguranță; Bandă elastică (Peacock); Rabatabil în jos; Eliberare magnetică; Fără; Știft și țeavă; Eliberare prin rotație; Brațe de siguranță (spotter arms); Curele de siguranță; Braț cu deschidere laterală; Braț pivotant; Altele
fi: Turvallisuusmekanismityyppi: Pultattava; Irtoava häkki; Kuminauha (Peacock); Alaskääntyvä; Magneettivapautus; Ei mitään; Tappi ja putki; Kääntyvä vapautus; Turvaraudat; Turvahihnat; Sivulle avautuva varsi; Keinuva varsi; Muu
tr: Güvenlik mekanizması tipi: Cıvatalı; Ayrılabilir kafes; Elastik bant (Peacock); Aşağı katlanır; Manyetik serbest bırakma; Yok; Pim ve boru; Dönerek serbest bırakma; Güvenlik destek kolları; Güvenlik kayışları; Yana açılan kol; Sallanan kol; Diğer
pl: Typ mechanizmu zabezpieczającego: Skręcany; Klatka z bezpiecznym wypięciem; Gumka (Peacock); Opadający; Zwolnienie magnetyczne; Brak; Rurka i bolec (Pin & pipe); Wypięcie rotacyjne; Ramiona asekuracyjne; Pasy asekuracyjne; Ramię otwierane na bok; Wahadłowe ramię; Inny
vi: Loại cơ chế an toàn: Bắt vít; Lồng tách rời; Dây thun (Peacock); Gập xuống; Tháo bằng từ tính; Không có; Chốt và ống; Tháo bằng cách xoay; Thanh đỡ an toàn; Dây đai an toàn; Nhánh mở một bên; Nhánh trục xoay; Khác
bg-BG: Тип предпазен механизъм: С болтове; Откачаща се клетка; Ластик (Peacock); Свалящ се надолу; Магнитно освобождаване; Няма; Щифт и тръба; Ротационно освобождаване; Предпазни рамене; Предпазни ремъци; Странично отварящо се рамо; Подвижно рамо; Друго
sk-SK: Typ bezpečnostného mechanizmu: Skrutkovací; Odlomovacia klietka; Gumička (Peacock); Sklápací; Magnetické uvoľnenie; Žiadny; Kolík a rúrka; Rotačné uvoľnenie; Bezpečnostné ramená; Bezpečnostné popruhy; Rameno s bočným otváraním; Výkyvné rameno; Iné
sv: Typ av säkerhetsmekanism: Fastskruvad; Breakaway-bur; Gummiband (Peacock); Nedfällbar; Magnetisk utlösning; Ingen; Pin & pipe; Roterande utlösning; Säkerhetsarmar; Säkerhetsremmar; Sidoöppnande arm; Svängbar arm; Övrigt
es: Tipo de mecanismo de seguridad: Fijación con pernos; Jaula desmontable; Banda elástica (Peacock); Abatible; Liberación magnética; Ninguno; Pasador y tubo; Liberación rotacional; Brazos de seguridad (spotter); Correas de seguridad; Brazo de apertura lateral; Brazo oscilante; Otro
fr: Type de mécanisme de sécurité: À boulonner; Coque de sécurité détachable; Bande élastique (Peacock); Rabattable; Détachement magnétique; Aucun; Broche et tube; Détachement rotatif; Bras de sécurité; Sangles de sécurité; Branche à ouverture latérale; Branche pivotante; Autre
zh-CN: 安全装置类型: 螺栓固定式; 分离式护架; 弹力带（孔雀式）; 下翻式; 磁吸释放; 无; 销和管式; 旋转释放; 安全保护臂; 安全带; 侧开臂; 摆臂; 其他
de: Sicherheitsmechanismus: Geschraubt; Breakaway-Käfig; Gummiband (Peacock); Herunterklappbar; Magnetischer Auslöser; Keiner; Pin & Pipe; Rotationsauslöser; Sicherheitsablagen (Spotter Arms); Sicherheitsgurte; Seitlich öffnender Arm; Schwenkarm; Sonstige
it: Tipo di meccanismo di sicurezza: Bullonato; Gabbia di sicurezza a sgancio; Elastico (Peacock); Ribaltabile; Sgancio magnetico; Nessuno; Perno e tubo; Sgancio rotazionale; Bracci di sicurezza (spotter); Cinghie di sicurezza; Braccio ad apertura laterale; Braccio oscillante; Altro
nl: Type veiligheidsmechanisme: Aangeschroefd; Breakaway-kooi; Elastische band (Peacock); Neerklapbaar; Magnetische ontgrendeling; Geen; Pin & pipe; Roterende ontgrendeling; Safety spotter-armen; Veiligheidsbanden; Zijwaarts openende arm; Zwenkarm; Overige
th: ประเภทของกลไกความปลอดภัย: ขันน็อต; กรงแบบปลดเร็ว; แถบยางยืด(Peacock); แบบพับลง; ปลดด้วยแม่เหล็ก; ไม่มี; สลักและท่อ; ปลดด้วยการหมุน; แขนรับน้ำหนักนิรภัย; สายรัดนิรภัย; แขนเปิดด้านข้าง; แขนสวิง; อื่นๆ